Wisconsin, session 2025, SB389.
do enact as follows:SB389,1Section 1. 121.905 (3) (c) 6. of the statutes is amended to read:121.905 (3) (c) 6. For the limit for each of the 2015-16 to 2018-19 school years, for the 2021-22 school year, for the 2027-28 school year, and for any school year thereafter, make no adjustment to the result under par. (b).SB389,2Section 2. 121.905 (3) (c) 9. of the statutes is amended to read:121.905 (3) (c) 9. For the limit for 2023-2425, add Add $325 to the result under par. (b) for the limit for the 2023-24 to 2026-2027 school years.SB389,3Section 3. 121.91 (2m) (j) (intro.) of the statutes is amended to read:121.91 (2m) (j) (intro.) Notwithstanding par. (i) and except as provided in subs. (3), (4), and (8), a school district cannot increase its revenues for each school year beginning with the 2020-21 school year-year 2425 year and ending with the 2026-27 school year to an amount that exceeds the amount calculated as follows:SB389,4Section 4. 121.91 (2m) (t) 1. (intro.) of the statutes is amended to read:121.91 (2m) (t) 1. (intro.) If 2 or more school districts are consolidated under s. 117.08 or 117.09, in the 2019-20 school year, the consolidated school district’s revenue limit shall be determined as provided under par. (im), in the 2020-21 school year, 2023-year 2425 to the 2026-27 school year, the consolidated school district’s revenue limit shall be determined as provided under par. (j), and in the 2027-28 school year and each school year thereafter, the consolidated school district’s revenue limit shall be determined as provided under par. (i), except as follows:SB389,5Section 5. Effective date.(1) This act takes effect on January 1, 2027. Down Down /2025/related/vetoedinfull/sb389 true vetoedenrolledbills /2025/related/vetoedinfull/sb389 vetoedenrolledbills/2025/REG/SB389 vetoedenrolledbills/2025/REG/SB389 section true Menu»2025»Related Documents»Vetoed in Full»SB389: Text as Enrolled × Details for PDF view Link (Permanent link) Bookmark this location View toggle Go to top of document Search in this chapter Search in this section Search in this agency Search in this chapter group Search in this chapter Search in this section Cross references for section Acts affecting this section References to this 1970 Statutes Annotations Appellate Court Citations Administrative Code Index Reference lines Clear highlighting